South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4031.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 11, Title 57 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 57-11-30.  (A) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the fees and fines collected pursuant to Sections 12-37-2740(D), 38-73-470, 56-1-140(B)(2), 56-1-143, 56-1-148(D), 56-1-170(B)(3), 56-1-200, 56-1-220(B), 56-1-286(K), 56-1-390(2), 56-1-395, 56-1-400(A), 56-1-460(A)(1)(e)(iii), 56-1-550, 56-1-740(B)(3), 56-1-746(D)(3), 56-1-1320(B), 56-1-2080, 56-1-3350(B)(2), 56-3-210(B), 56-3-355, 56-3-1335, 56-3-1290, 56-3-1920(C), 56-3-2330(B), 56-3-2335(B)(2), 56-3-2340(C), 56-3-3500(B), 56-3-3600(B), 56-3-3710(B), 56-3-3950, 56-3-4100(B), 56-3-4200(C), 56-3-4410(B), 56-3-4510(C), 56-3-4600(B), 56-3-4800(B), 56-3-4910(B), 56-3-5200(B), 56-3-5400(B), 56-3-7200(B), 56-3-7300(B), 56-3-7320, 56-3-7330(B)(2), 56-3-7700(B), 56-3-7750(B), 56-3-7860, 56-3-7910(B), 56-3-7950(B), 56-3-8000(C), 56-3-8100(B), 56-3-8100(F), 56-3-8200(A), 56-3-8300(A), 56-3-8400(A), 56-3-8600(B), 56-3-8710(C), 56-3-9400(B), 56-3-9600(B), 56-3-9710(B), 56-3-10010(B), 56-3-13710(B), 56-5-750(G)(3), 56-5-2942(J), 56-5-2951(B)(1), 56-5-2951(H), 56-9-330, 56-10-240(C), 56-10-245, 56-10-552, 56-10-260(B)(3), 56-19-265(D), 56-19-420(C), and 56-19-520(A)(4), and any other fees or fines otherwise credited to the State Transportation Infrastructure Bank must be credited to the State Highway Fund as established by Section 57-11-20, to be expended as provided in this section. (B) The Department of Transportation shall allocate the funds credited to the State Highway Fund pursuant to subsection (A) to: (1) pay the debts and debt service incurred by the State Transportation Infrastructure Bank; and (2) the state-funded resurfacing program. The Department of Transportation shall develop and implement a needs-based methodology to distribute revenue within the state funded-resurfacing program, which shall include consideration on a county-by-county basis, to ensure that each county in the State is guaranteed funding for resurfacing. (C) The Secretary of Transportation shall continue the prioritization of bridge and resurfacing needs as required by the former Section 11-43-167(D) in amounts at least equal to the amounts spent in Fiscal Year 2024-2025. SECTION 2.  Chapter 43, Title 11 of the S.C. Code is repealed. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----